Nevada, session 2025Special36, SB4.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to restore the balance in the Contingency Account created by
NRS 353.266 the sum of $31,490,000.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the purchase of
hybrid healthcare kiosks the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $594,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,188,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education created by NRS 385.910 the sum of $50,000 for travel
expenses of the members of the Commission.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of
$1,950,000 to enter into a contract with a qualified entity to assist
the Commission on Innovation and Excellence in Education created
by NRS 385.910 in developing recommendations pursuant to NRS
385.920 and to assist the Department in implementing such
recommendations.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Human Services the sum of $15,615,919 for the
provision of a jail-based behavioral health program during the 2025-
2027 biennium.
2. Of the amount appropriated by subsection 1, the Division
shall allocate for use for the purpose set forth in subsection 1:
(a) The sum of $8,100,000 to Clark County; and
(b) The sum of $7,515,919 to Washoe County.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 3 –
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 6.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of
$5,406,013 for allocation to the Division of Public and Behavioral
Health of the Department of Human Services for distribution to
Clark County for the provision of a jail-based behavioral health
program during the 2025-2027 biennium.
2. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be allocated
by the Interim Finance Committee upon the submittal by the
Division of a plan received from the Board of County
Commissioners of Clark County for the provision of a jail-based
behavioral health program.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of
$7,630,000 for purchases of equipment for the Nevada State Public
Health Laboratory.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Indigent Defense Services the
sum of $3,000,000 for the costs of stipends for public defenders and
other costs of the Department related to compliance with the Davis
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 4 –
v. State (Nev. First Jud. Dist. Ct. Case No. 170C002271B (Aug. 11,
2020)) consent judgment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 9. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Social Services of the Department of Human
Services the sums of $1,256,686 for the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$19,422,534 for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for costs related to the
administration of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
This appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 17 of
chapter 58, Statutes of Nevada 2025, at page 309.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Health Authority for compensating
brokers for enrolling persons in health plans under the Public Option
established pursuant to NRS 695K.200 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,250,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,250,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Nevada Health Authority the sum of $2,000,000 for carrying out a
program to award grants, using a request for proposals process, to
community-based organizations for providing education and
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 5 –
enrollment assistance related to Nevada Medicaid and the Public
Option established pursuant to NRS 695K.200.
2. The Nevada Health Authority shall submit with its request
for each allocation of the money appropriated by subsection 1 the
ranking of the proposals for grants to be awarded with the
allocation.
3. At least once during each fiscal year of the 2025-2027
biennium, the Nevada Health Authority shall submit to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services a report of the
grants awarded under the grant program carried out pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and
Councils Standards within the Department of Business and Industry
for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 the sum of $330,550 for personnel
costs.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 13. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Public Works Division of the Department
of Administration the sum of $68,500,000 to support the Division in
carrying out the project numbered or otherwise described as Project
26-C01, UNR Life Sciences Building.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 6 –
2. Expenditure of $68,500,000 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the
same purpose as set forth in subsection 1.
3. The State Public Works Division shall not execute a contract
for construction of the project described in subsection 1 until the
Division has determined that the funding authorized in subsection 2
for the project has been awarded or received and is available for
expenditure for the project.
4. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding authorized
in subsection 2 for the project described in subsection 1 must be
expended before the money appropriated by subsection 1.
5. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 13.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Public Works Division of the Department
of Administration the sum of $68,500,000 to support the Division in
carrying out the project numbered or otherwise described as Project
26-C02 for the construction of a new building for the Lee Business
School at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
2. Expenditure of $106,500,000 not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the
same purpose as set forth in subsection 1.
3. The State Public Works Division shall not execute a contract
for the construction of the project described in subsection 1 until the
Division has determined that the funding authorized in subsection 2
for the project has been awarded or received and is available for
expenditure for the project.
4. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding authorized
in subsection 2 for the project described in subsection 1 must be
expended before the money appropriated by subsection 1.
5. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 7 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of
section 1 of Assembly Bill No. 592, chapter 59, Statutes of Nevada
2025, at page 329, the maximum annual salary for the Director,
State Chief Information Officer of the Governor’s Technology
Office within the Office of the Governor is $180,534.
Sec. 15. NRS 385.910 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.910 1. The Commission on Innovation and Excellence in
Education is hereby created. The Commission consists of:
(a) Three members who are Senators, two of whom are
appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate and one of whom is
appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(b) Three members who are members of the Assembly, two of
whom are appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly and one of
whom is appointed by the Minority Leader of the Assembly;
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(d) The Director of the Office of Finance;
(e) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher Education;
(f) One member who is a representative of the State Board of
Education, appointed by the President of the State Board;
(g) One member who is a teacher and member of the Nevada
State Education Association, appointed by the President of that
Association;
(h) One member who is a teacher and member of the Clark
County Education Association, appointed by the President of that
Association;
(i) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Administrators;
(j) One member who is a member of the board of trustees of a
school district, appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Boards;
(k) One member who is a superintendent of schools of a school
district, appointed by the Nevada Association of School
Superintendents;
(l) One member who is the chief financial officer of a school
district, appointed by the Association of School Business Officials
International;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 8 –
(m) One member appointed by the Nevada Association of
Counties;
(n) One member appointed by the Nevada League of Cities;
(o) One member who is the representative of an organization
that advocates for public education, appointed by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction;
(p) One member who is the parent or guardian of a pupil who is
enrolled in a public school in this State, appointed by the Nevada
Parent Teacher Association;
(q) One member who is a representative of the public at large,
appointed by the Governor;
(r) Two members who own or manage a business located in this
State, appointed by the Governor; [and]
(s) One member who serves on the Commission on School
Funding created by NRS 387.1246 [.] ;
(t) The dean of the College of Education and Human
Development at the University of Nevada, Reno, or his or her
designee;
(u) The dean of the College of Education at the University of
Nevada, Las Vegas, or his or her designee; and
(v) The dean of the School of Education at Nevada State
University, or his or her designee.
2. In appointing the members of the Commission described in
paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection 1, the appointing authorities
shall coordinate the appointments so that:
(a) One member is a teacher in an elementary school and one
member is a teacher in a secondary school, respectively; and
(b) One member is a teacher in a public school in an urban
setting and one member is a teacher in a public school in a rural
setting, respectively.
 The appointing authorities shall, in appointing a member at the
beginning of each term, alternate the characteristics described in
paragraphs (a) and (b) so that each member appointed to the
Commission does not possess the same characteristic in consecutive
terms.
3. If any organization listed in subsection 1 ceases to exist, the
appointment required pursuant to that subsection must be made by
the organization’s successor in interest or, if there is no successor in
interest, by the Governor.
4. In appointing the members of the Commission described in
subsection 1, the appointing authorities shall coordinate the
appointments when practicable so that the members of the
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 9 –
Commission represent the diversity of this State, including, without
limitation, regional, ethnic, economic and gender diversity.
5. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Commission, is entitled
to receive the travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
6. Each appointed member of the Commission serves a term of
2 years and may be reappointed for additional terms of 2 years in the
same manner as the original appointment. Any vacancy occurring in
the membership of the Commission must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment not later than 30 days after the
vacancy occurs.
7. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall call the first
meeting of the Commission. At its first meeting and annually
thereafter, the members of the Commission shall elect a Chair and a
Vice Chair from among the members of the Commission.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once each calendar
quarter and as needed at the call of the Chair.
9. The Commission may appoint subcommittees to address
designated projects or consider specific problems or other matters
that are related to and within the scope of the functions of the
Commission, as the Commission determines necessary to carry out
the duties of the Commission.
10. The Department shall provide any administrative support
necessary for the Commission to carry out its duties.
Sec. 16. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in
NRS 218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 17. 1. This section, sections 1 to 11, inclusive, and 13 to
16, inclusive, of this act become effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 12 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)